Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.901

Contingency—Effective date—1985 c 418.

If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill number, is not provided by the legislature by July 1, 1987, this act shall be null and void. This act shall be of no effect until such specific funding is provided. If such funding is so provided, this act shall take effect when the legislation providing the funding takes effect.

[ 1985 c 418 s 12. Formerly RCW 43.215.901, 28A.215.904, 28A.34A.900.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: (1) 1986 c 312 s 211 provides specific funding for the purposes of this act.

(2) 1986 c 312 took effect April 4, 1986.